src-fst-morphology-affixes-verbs.lexc.md
INDPRTSG1 for Sg1

INDPRTSG2 for Sg2

INDPRTSG3 for Sg3

INDPRTPL1 for Pl1

INDPRTPL2 for Pl2

INDPRTPL3 for Pl3

### Vowel stems

V-VowelStem

V-VowelStem-PRS This lexicon gives all forms for formatives with obligatory onset vowel

#### Present Morphology

ACT_IND_PRSSG1 for Sg1

ACT_IND_PRSSG2 for Sg2

ACT_IND_PRSSG3 for Sg3

ACT_IND_PRSPL1 for Pl1

ACT_IND_PRSPL2 for Pl2

ACT_IND_PRSPL3 for Pl3

#### IMPERATIVE 

#### present reflexive

#### Preterite 

#### conditional present 

#### Imperfect Reflexive 

#### Conditional Present Reflexive

### Consonant Stems

V-ConsonantStem V-ConsonantStem_OTHER ;

V-ConsonantStem_OTHER 

#### Imperative 

#### Conditional Imperfect 

#### Reflexive 

#### Imperative 

V-ConsonantStem_d/g

V-ConsonantStem_d/k 

V-ConsonantStem_t/k 

V-ConsonantStem_t/g 

V-ConsonantStem_t/gha 

V-ConsonantStem_d/gha 

this could be a reflexive infinitive if you want one, jaska 20241111

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-vep/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc)</small>
